Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.720

Prerequisite for zoning.

Zoning maps as an official control may be adopted only for areas covered by a comprehensive plan containing not less than a land use element and a circulation element. Zoning ordinances and maps adopted prior to June 10, 1959, are hereby validated, provided only that at the time of their enactment the comprehensive plan for the county existed according to law applicable at that time.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.720. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 72.]